West Virginia, session 2026, HB4781.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 15. ACCIDENT AND SICKNESS INSURANCE. §33-15-4y. Insurance coverage for laser hair removal. Any group or individual policy of accident or health insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for medically necessary laser hair removal if the procedure is a prescribed medical treatment in accordance with generally accepted standards of medical care.